Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 13.2 Drilling of Drinking Water Wells

46-13.2-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Building official” means the local building official authorized in accordance with § 23-27.3-107 or the state building code commissioner authorized in accordance with §

23-27.3-108.2

, as applicable;

“Board” means the Rhode Island contractors’ registration and licensing board;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or organization, or any combination thereof;

“Well” means an artificial sanitary excavation or opening in the ground, by which groundwater can be obtained or through which it flows under natural pressure or is artificially withdrawn; and for the purposes of this chapter, excepting §

46-13.2-3(c)

, attached as an appurtenance to a building or structure.

“Well drilling contractor” means a person who engages in well drilling, including the installation pumps as provided herein;

“Well drilling” means and includes the industry, procedure and all operations engaged in by any person, full-time or part-time, for compensation or otherwise, to obtain water from a well or wells by drilling, or other methods, for any purpose or use.

“Appurtenance” means and includes the installation, alteration or repair of wells connected to a structure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to promote public health and welfare and protect the environment by providing specifying standards for the installation of a well and providing a mechanism to ensure that all well drilling contractors conducting business in the state of Rhode Island have the requisite skills, training and experience necessary to safely and adequately install water wells within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-3.
Regulations.

The Rhode Island building standards committee, pursuant to §

23-27.3-100.1.5

shall by no later than December 31, 2013, incorporate in the appropriate portions of the state building codes minimum standards for the location, design, construction and installation of wells that are appurtenances to buildings in consultation with the department of health, the division of statewide planning and the department of environmental management, with due regard for the preservation of public health, and protection of public welfare and the environment.

In those circumstances in which compliance with the requirements for locating a new or replacement well would result in undue hardship, property owners may seek a variance from any one or more of the siting requirements, in accordance with the following:

Except as specified in (3), from the building code board of appeals authorized in the municipality with jurisdiction over the property on which the well is proposed;

Except as specified in (3), in the absence of a local building code board of appeals, from the state building code board of appeals; and

From the department of environmental management in all cases in which the well is proposed to be installed as part of an application for the new construction of or repair of an on-site wastewater disposal system. The appropriate authority specified above may grant a variance to the extent necessary to ameliorate the undue hardship and to the extent the exemption can be granted without impairing the intent and purpose of this chapter.

To protect public health and the environment, the Rhode Island department of environmental management is authorized to promulgate regulations applicable to the owners of on-site wastewater systems that limit the installation of any type of well, including wells installed for irrigation systems, near the on-site wastewater treatment systems on the owner’s property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-4.
Registration and licensing of well drilling contractors and pump installers.

No person shall install a well or a pump within a water well unless registered or licensed with the proper authorities in accordance with this chapter, chapter 65 of title 5, and chapter 65.2 of title 5. Well drilling contractors are subject to the jurisdiction of the contractors’ registration and licensing board including the registration procedures of the board authorized by chapter 65 of title 5 and in effect at the time of passage of this act.

A municipality engaged in well drilling shall be exempt from the registration or license provisions of this chapter if the drilling is done by regular employees of, and with equipment owned by, the municipality, and the work is on wells intended for use by the municipality.

This chapter shall not restrict a plumber or electrician from engaging in the trade for which he or she has been licensed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-5.
Record of wells.

Within ten (10) days after completion of a new or replacement well, a well drilling contractor shall provide the owner, the building official and the department of health a well installation report conforming to the form, content, and means specified by the department of health. This well installation report will at a minimum indicate:

The well owner’s name and address,

The physical location of the well,

The well depth,

The geologic materials and thickness of materials penetrated,

The length and type of casing,

The static water levels,

The results of a well yield test that conforms to industry standards, and

Any other additional information which may be required by the department of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 7, effective January 1, 2013.

46-13.2-7.
Well constructed for farming or private use.

A landowner may construct his or her own well to provide water for the consumption by himself or herself, his or her family, pets, livestock, or for farming of his or her land where the water obtained shall not be intended for use by the general public or in any residence other than the landowner’s, and the landowner shall not be required to be registered under §

46-13.2-4

, but must submit a well installation report as required by §

46-13.2-5

and comply with all regulations and codes of construction adopted under this chapter and § 23-27.3 and comply as applicable with requirements of §

23-1-5.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 2.

46-13.2-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 7, effective January 1, 2013.

46-13.2-9.
Existing and abandoned wells.

No well in existence on July 1, 1987 shall be required to conform to the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto; provided any well now or hereafter abandoned, shall be brought into compliance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter if the well is intended again to be used for the supply of groundwater.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2.

46-13.2-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 17, § 7, effective January 1, 2013.

46-13.2-11.
Duties and powers of department of health not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect or limit the duties and powers of the department of health as provided by law, in matters relating to the purity, potability, and safe guarding of well waters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2.

46-13.2-12.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter shall for any reason be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof, directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 257, § 2.